Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-505
Engineering or architectural consultant; hiring authorized.

The department may hire an engineering or architectural consultant to assist the department with the development of project performance criteria and requests for proposals, with evaluation of proposals, with evaluation of the construction to determine adherence to the project performance criteria, and with any additional services requested by the department to represent its interests in relation to a project. The procedures used to hire such person or organization shall comply with the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act. The person or organization hired shall be ineligible to be included as a provider of other services in a proposal for the project for which the person or organization has been hired and shall not be employed by or have a financial or other interest in a design-builder or construction manager who will submit a proposal.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 5.

Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, see section 81-1702.